Florida, session 2026, SB450.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsection (3), paragraph (b) of subsection (4), 12 subsection (5), and paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of section 13 196.081, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 14 196.081âExemption for certain permanently and totally 15 disabled veterans and for surviving spouses of veterans; 16 exemption for surviving spouses of first responders who die in 17 the line of duty.â 18 (3)âIf the totally and permanently disabled veteran 19 predeceases his or her spouse and if, upon the death of the 20 veteran, the spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the 21 homestead and permanently resides thereon as specified in s. 22 196.031, the exemption from taxation carries over to the benefit 23 of the veteranâs spouse until such time as he or she remarries 24 or sells or otherwise disposes of the property. If the spouse 25 sells the property, the spouse may transfer an exemption not to 26 exceed the amount granted from the most recent ad valorem tax 27 roll to his or her new residence, as long as it is used as his 28 or her primary residence and he or she does not remarry. 29 (4)âAny real estate that is owned and used as a homestead 30 by the surviving spouse of a veteran who died from service 31 connected causes while on active duty as a member of the United 32 States Armed Forces and for whom a letter from the United States 33 Government or United States Department of Veterans Affairs or 34 its predecessor has been issued certifying that the veteran who 35 died from service-connected causes while on active duty is 36 exempt from taxation. 37 (b)âThe tax exemption carries over to the benefit of the 38 veteranâs surviving spouse as long as the spouse holds the legal 39 or beneficial title to the homestead, permanently resides 40 thereon as specified in s. 196.031, and does not remarry. If the 41 surviving spouse sells the property, the spouse may transfer an 42 exemption not to exceed the amount granted under the most recent 43 ad valorem tax roll to his or her new residence as long as it is 44 used as his or her primary residence and he or she does not 45 remarry. 46 (5)âAn applicant for the exemption under this section may 47 apply for the exemption before receiving the necessary 48 documentation from the United States Government or the United 49 States Department of Veterans Affairs or its predecessor. Upon 50 receipt of the documentation, the exemption shall be granted as 51 of the date when the applicant became eligible for such 52 exemption of the original application, and the excess taxes paid 53 shall be refunded. Any refund of excess taxes paid shall be 54 limited to those paid during the 4-year period of limitation set 55 forth in s. 197.182(1)(e). 56 (6)âAny real estate that is owned and used as a homestead 57 by the surviving spouse of a first responder who died in the 58 line of duty while employed by the United States Government, the 59 state, or any political subdivision of the state, including 60 authorities and special districts, and for whom a letter from 61 the United States Government, the state, or appropriate 62 political subdivision of the state, or other authority or 63 special district, has been issued which legally recognizes and 64 certifies that the first responder died in the line of duty 65 while employed as a first responder is exempt from taxation. 66 (b)âThe tax exemption applies as long as the surviving 67 spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the homestead, 68 permanently resides thereon as specified in s. 196.031, and does 69 not remarry. If the surviving spouse sells the property, the 70 spouse may transfer an exemption not to exceed the amount 71 granted under the most recent ad valorem tax roll to his or her 72 new residence if it is used as his or her primary residence and 73 he or she does not remarry. 74 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.